Washington statutes.
RCW 41.45.050

Contributions to be based on rates established in this chapter—Allocation formula for contributions.

(1) Employers of members of the public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, the Washington state patrol retirement system, and the higher education retirement plans shall make contributions to those systems and plans based on the rates established in RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070.

(2) The state shall make contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 based on the rates established in RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070. The state treasurer shall transfer the required contributions each month on the basis of salary data provided by the department.

(3) The department shall bill employers, and the state shall make contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2, using the combined rates established in RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070 regardless of the level of appropriation provided in the biennial budget. Any member of an affected retirement system may, by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding, require the transfer and payment of funds as directed in this section.

(4) The contributions received for the public employees' retirement system shall be allocated between the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 employer contribution shall first be deposited in the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. All remaining public employees' retirement system employer contributions shall be deposited in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund.

(5) The contributions received for the teachers' retirement system shall be allocated between the plan 1 fund and the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the combined plan 2 and plan 3 employer contribution shall first be deposited in the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. All remaining teachers' retirement system employer contributions shall be deposited in the plan 1 fund.

(6) The contributions received for the school employees' retirement system shall be allocated between the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the combined plan 2 and plan 3 employer contribution shall first be deposited in the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. All remaining school employees' retirement system employer contributions shall be deposited in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund.

(7) The contributions received for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 shall be deposited in the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 fund.

(8) The contributions received for the public safety employees' retirement system shall be allocated between the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the plan 2 employer contribution shall first be deposited in the plan 2 fund. All remaining public safety employees' retirement system employer contributions shall be deposited in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund.

(9) The contributions received for the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund shall be deposited in the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund and amounts received from each institution accounted for separately and shall only be used to make benefit payments to the beneficiaries of that institution's plan.

[ 2020 c 103 s 3; 2004 c 242 s 38; 2002 c 26 s 5; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 8; (2001 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 7 expired March 1, 2002); 2000 c 247 s 503; 1998 c 341 s 403; 1995 c 239 s 308; 1989 c 273 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2020 c 103: See notes following RCW 28B.10.423.

Effective date—2004 c 242: See RCW 41.37.901.

Effective date—2001 2nd sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 41.45.010.

Expiration date—2001 2nd sp.s. c 11 ss 1 and 7: See note following RCW 41.45.010.

Effective date—2001 2nd sp. s. c 11: See note following RCW 41.45.030.

Effective dates—Subchapter headings not law—2000 c 247: See RCW 41.40.931 and 41.40.932.

Effective date—1998 c 341: See RCW 41.35.901.

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.

Benefits not contractual right until date specified: RCW 41.34.100.